Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Subarticle B. Affidavit Ballots and Challenged Ballots.

§ 23-15-571.
Challenge to voter qualifications.

The following persons shall be designated as authorized challengers and shall be allowed to challenge the qualifications of any person offering to vote:

Any candidate whose name is on the ballot in the precinct in which the challenge is made;

Any official poll watcher of a candidate whose name is on the ballot in the precinct in which the challenge is made;

Any official poll watcher of a political party for the precinct in which the challenge is made;

Any qualified elector from the precinct in which the challenge is made; or

Any poll manager or poll worker in the polling place where the person whose qualifications are challenged is offering to vote.

The challenge of any authorized challenger shall be considered and acted upon by the poll managers of the election.

A person offering to vote may be challenged upon the following grounds:

That the voter is not a registered voter in the precinct;

That the voter is not the registered voter under whose name the voter has applied to vote;

That the voter has already voted in the election;

That the voter is not a resident in the precinct where the voter is registered;

That the voter has illegally registered to vote;

That the voter has removed his or her ballot from the polling place; or

That the voter is otherwise disqualified by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 181; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 114, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-573.
Certain persons not to vote except by affidavit ballot; form of affidavit ballot envelope; procedure after voting by affidavit ballot when acceptable photo identification was not presented.

If any person declares that he or she is a registered voter in the jurisdiction in which he or she offers to vote and that he or she is eligible to vote in the election, but his or her name does not appear upon the pollbooks, or that he or she is not able to cast a regular election day ballot under a provision of state or federal law but is otherwise qualified to vote, or that he or she has been illegally denied registration, or that he or she is unable to present an acceptable form of photo identification:

A poll manager shall notify the person that he or she may cast an affidavit ballot at the election.

The person shall be permitted to cast an affidavit ballot at the polling place upon execution of a written affidavit before one (1) of the poll managers stating that the individual:

Believes he or she is a registered voter in the jurisdiction in which he or she desires to vote and is eligible to vote in the election; or

Is not able to cast a regular election day ballot under a provision of state or federal law but is otherwise qualified to vote; or

Believes that he or she has been illegally denied registration; or

Is unable to present an acceptable form of photo identification.

The poll manager shall allow the individual to mark a paper ballot properly endorsed by the initialing poll manager or alternate initialing poll manager in accordance with Section 23-15-541, which shall be delivered by him or her to the proper election official who shall enclose it in an affidavit ballot envelope, with the written and signed affidavit of the voter affixed to the envelope, seal the envelope and mark plainly upon it the name of the person offering to vote.

The affidavit ballot envelope shall include:

The complete name of the voter;

A present and previous physical and mailing address of the voter;

Telephone numbers where the voter may be contacted;

A statement that the affiant believes he or she is registered to vote in the jurisdiction in which he or she offers to vote;

The signature of the affiant; and

The signature of the poll manager at the polling place at which the affiant offers to vote.

A separate receipt book shall be maintained for affidavit voters and the affidavit voters shall sign the receipt book upon completing the affidavit ballot.

If the affidavit voter is casting an affidavit ballot because the voter is unable to present an acceptable form of photo identification and the voter’s name appears in the pollbook, then the poll manager shall write “NO ID” across from the voter’s name and in the appropriate column in the pollbook.

In canvassing the returns of the election, the executive committee in primary elections, or the election commissioners in other elections, shall examine the records and allow the ballot to be counted, or not counted as it appears legal.

An affidavit ballot of a voter who was unable to present an acceptable form of photo identification shall not be rejected for this reason if the voter does either of the following:

Returns to the circuit clerk’s office, or to the municipal clerk’s office for municipal elections, within five (5) business days after the date of the election and presents an acceptable form of photo identification;

Returns to the circuit clerk’s office within five (5) business days after the date of the election to obtain the Mississippi Voter Identification Card, or in municipal election, returns to the municipal clerk’s office within five (5) business days after the date of the election to present his or her Mississippi Voter Identification Card or Temporary Mississippi Voter Identification Card; or

Returns to the circuit clerk’s office, or to the municipal clerk’s office for municipal elections, within five (5) business days after the date of the election to execute a separate Affidavit of Religious Objection.

When a person is offered the opportunity to vote by affidavit ballot, he or she shall be provided with written information that informs the person how to ascertain whether his or her affidavit ballot was counted and, if the vote was not counted, the reasons the vote was not counted.

The officials in charge of the election shall process all affidavit ballots by using the Statewide Elections Management System. The officials in charge of the election shall account for all affidavit ballots cast in each election, categorizing the affidavit ballots cast by reason and recording the total number of affidavit ballots counted and not counted in each such category in the Statewide Elections Management System.

The Secretary of State shall, by rule duly adopted, establish a uniform affidavit ballot envelope that shall be used in all elections in this state. The Secretary of State shall print and distribute a sufficient number of affidavit ballot envelopes to the registrar of each county for use in elections. The registrar shall distribute the affidavit ballot envelopes to municipal and county executive committees for use in primary elections and to municipal and county election commissioners for use in all other elections.

County registrars and municipal registrars shall maintain a secure free access system that complies with the Help America Vote Act of 2002, by which persons who vote by affidavit ballot may determine if their ballots were counted, and if not, the reasons the ballot was not counted.

Any person who votes in any election as a result of a federal or state court order or other order extending the time established by law for closing the polls on an election day, may only vote by affidavit ballot. Any affidavit ballot cast under this subsection shall be separated and kept apart from other affidavit ballots cast by voters not affected by the order.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1942 Code § 3114 [Codes, 1906, § 3703; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6395; 1930, § 5872; repealed by Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 33, and 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 182; Laws, 2000, ch. 518, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 305, § 15; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 115, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2017.); Laws, 2018, ch. 344, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 8, 2018).

§ 23-15-574.
Modification of affidavit form by Secretary of State.

If the enactment of any state or federal law shall require any modification to the form or language of the affidavit prescribed in Section 23-15-573, then the Secretary of State shall be authorized to promulgate an amended form of the affidavit to comply with the requirements of any such state or federal law, which shall be required to be used in all elections throughout this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 518, § 2, eff from and after August 11, 2000 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the enactment of this section).

§ 23-15-575.
Who may vote in primary election.

No person shall vote or attempt to vote in the primary election of one (1) party when he or she has voted on the same date in the primary election of another party. No person shall vote or attempt to vote in the second primary election of one (1) party when he or she has voted in the first primary election of another party.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1942 Code § 3129 [Codes, 1906, § 3717; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6409; 1930, § 5887; Laws, 1932, ch. 238; Laws, 1934, ch. 308; Laws, 1947, 1st Ex. sess. ch. 17, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1948, ch. 309, §§ 1, 2; repealed by Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 33, and 1986, ch. 495, § 346]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 183; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 116, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2017).

§ 23-15-577.
Presence of credentialed poll watchers and candidates at polling place; presentation of written authorization of candidate or political party by credentialed poll watcher to poll manager; inspection and challenge of qualifications of voter by candidate or credentialed poll watcher; interference in election process by candidates and credentialed poll watchers prohibited.

Each candidate on the ballot shall have the right, either in person or by a credentialed poll watcher, to be present at the polling place. In general and special elections, each political party that has a candidate on the ballot shall have the right to be represented at the polling place by two (2) credentialed poll watchers.

A credentialed poll watcher means a poll watcher of good conduct and behavior, authorized in writing to act as the representative of a candidate on the ballot or political party that has a candidate on the ballot. The written authorization of the candidate or political party must be presented to a poll manager by the certified poll watcher upon arrival at the polling place.

Poll managers shall provide candidates and credentialed poll watchers with a suitable position from which they may be able to clearly see and hear the manner in which the election is held. Candidates and credentialed poll watchers shall be authorized to bring their own pollbooks, whether in a print or electronic form, to the polling place during each general and special election.

Candidates and credentialed poll watchers shall be allowed to challenge the qualifications of any person offering to vote, and their challenge shall be considered and acted upon by the poll managers. However, candidates and credentialed poll watchers shall not be allowed to interfere in the election process, which shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

Communicating with any voter;

Physically touching or handling any ballot, absentee ballot envelope, absentee ballot application or affidavit ballot envelope;

Viewing or photographing the pollbooks while at the polling place; or

Photographing the receipt books while at the polling place.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-1-41 [Codes, 1906, § 3716; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6408; 1930, § 5886; Laws, 1942, § 3128.5; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 7; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 331]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 184; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 117, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2017).

§ 23-15-579.
Procedure when vote challenged.

All votes, which shall be challenged at the polls, whether the question be raised by a poll manager or another authorized challenger, shall be considered by the poll managers at that time.

When it so clearly appears in the unanimous opinion of the poll managers, either by the admissions or statements of the person challenged or from documentary or oral evidence then presented to the poll managers, that the challenge is well taken, the vote shall be rejected entirely and shall not be counted. In such case, the challenged voter shall mark his or her choices and cast his or her vote by paper ballot. After the ballot has been marked by the challenged voter, it shall be marked by the poll manager on the back “REJECTED” and the name of the voter and the reason the ballot of the challenged voter was rejected shall also be written on the back of the ballot. All rejected ballots shall be placed in the ballot box until the close of the polls at which time, upon the opening of the ballot box, all rejected ballots shall be placed in a separate strong envelope and returned to the box.

When it so clearly appears in the unanimous opinion of the poll managers, either by the admissions or statements of the person challenged or from documentary or oral evidence then presented to the poll managers, that the challenge is frivolous and not made in good faith, the poll managers shall disregard the challenge and the voter shall cast his or her vote as other voters in the polling place as though not challenged.

When it does not so clearly appear whether the challenge is well taken or frivolous and no unanimous decision can be made by the poll managers, the challenged voter shall mark his or her choices and cast his or her vote by paper ballot. After the ballot has been marked by the challenged voter, it shall be marked by the poll managers on the back “CHALLENGED,” and the name of the voter and the reason the challenge of the voter was made shall also be written on the back of the ballot. All challenged ballots shall be placed in the ballot box until the close of the polls at which time, upon the opening of the ballot box, all challenged ballots shall be removed therefrom and separately counted, tallied and totaled with a separate return made of the challenged votes. Challenged ballots shall be placed in a separate strong envelope, and returned to the ballot box.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-25 [Codes, 1942, § 3170; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 333]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 185; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 118, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2017).

§ 23-15-581.
Closing polls, opening ballot box and counting votes.

When the last qualified voter, who was standing in line at the polling place at 7:00 p.m., has cast his or her ballot, or 7:00 p.m., whichever is later, the poll managers shall proclaim that the polls are closed and publicly break the seal and open the ballot box to immediately proceed to count the ballots, at the same time reading aloud the names of the persons voted for, which shall be taken down. During the holding of the election and the counting of the ballots, the whole proceedings shall be in fair and full view of the voting public, candidates or their duly authorized representatives and other authorized poll watchers, without unnecessary interference, delay or encroachment upon the good order of the duties and proceedings of the poll managers and other officers of the election. There shall be no unnecessary delay and no adjournment except as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-3-13 [ (Codes, 1942, § 3164; Laws, 1935, ch. 19; Laws, 1960, ch. 448; 1857, ch. 4, art 12; 1871, §§ 370, 371; 1880, § 136; 1892, § 3648; 1906, § 4155; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6789; 1930, § 6238; 1942, § 3267; Laws, 1916, ch. 230; Laws, 1960, ch. 451; Laws, 1964, ch. 511, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, §§ 333, 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 186; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 119, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 18, 2017).